Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Discipline.
§ 22.1-277.2.
Authority to exclude students under certain circumstances; petition for readmission; alternative education program.

A student, who has been expelled or suspended for more than thirty days from attendance at school by a school board or a private school in this Commonwealth or in another state or for whom admission has been withdrawn by a private school in this Commonwealth or in another state may be excluded from attendance by a local school board in Virginia, regardless of whether such student has been admitted to another school division or private school in the Commonwealth or in another state subsequent to such expulsion, suspension, or withdrawal of admission upon a finding that the student presents a danger to the other students or staff of the school division after (i) written notice to the student and his parent that the student may be subject to exclusion, the reasons therefor, and, in the event of such exclusion, of the right to appeal the decision at a hearing before the school board or a committee thereof; and (ii) a review of the case has been conducted by the division superintendent or his designee and exclusion has been recommended.In the case of a suspension of more than thirty days, the term of the exclusion may not exceed the duration of such suspension.In excluding any such expelled student from school attendance, the local school board may accept or waive any or all of any conditions for readmission imposed upon such student by the expelling school board pursuant to § 22.1-277.06. The excluding school board shall not impose additional conditions for readmission to school.If the decision by the superintendent or his designee to exclude has been appealed to a committee of the school board, the student or his parent shall be provided written notice of the right to appeal the decision to the full board, which shall, within thirty days following any such hearing, in the case of an expulsion or withdrawal of admission and, in the case of a suspension of more than thirty days, within fifteen days following any such hearing, notify in writing the student or his parent of its decision.

In lieu of the procedures established in subsection A, a school board may adopt regulations providing that a student may be excluded from attendance after (i) written notice to the student and his parent that the student may be subject to exclusion, including the reasons therefor, and notice of the opportunity for the student or his parent to participate in a hearing to be conducted by the division superintendent or his designee regarding such exclusion; and (ii) a hearing of the case has been conducted by the division superintendent or his designee, and the decision has been to exclude the student from attendance. The decision of the superintendent or his designee to exclude shall be final unless altered by the school board, upon timely written petition, as established in regulation, of the student so excluded or his parent, for a review of the record by the school board.

Upon the expiration of the exclusion period for an expulsion or a withdrawal of admission, which period shall be established by the school board, committee thereof, or superintendent or his designee, as the case may be, at the relevant hearing, the student may re-petition the school board for admission. If the petition for admission is rejected, the school board shall identify the length of the continuing exclusion period and the subsequent date upon which such student may re-petition the school board for admission.

The school board may permit students excluded pursuant to this section to attend an alternative education program provided by the school board for the term of such exclusion.

History.

1993, c. 889; 1994, c. 709; 1996, c. 190; 1997, cc. 585, 608, 728; 2001, cc. 669, 688, 820.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 669, in subsection A, deleted “for an offense in violation of school board policies related to destruction of school property or privately-owned property while located on school property, weapons, alcohol or drugs, or for the willful infliction of injury to another person” preceding “may be excluded,” and deleted “for no more than one year in the case of an expulsion or withdrawal of admission and, in the case of a suspension of more than thirty days, for no longer than the duration of such suspension” following “withdrawal of admission,” and added the present second
and third paragraphs; and rewrote present subsection C, which formerly read: “Upon the expiration of the exclusion period for an expulsion, which shall not be more than one year, the student may petition the school board for admission. For the purposes of this section, ‘one year’ shall mean 365 calendar days.”

The 2001 amendments by cc. 688 and 820 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “for an offense in violation of school board policies related to destruction of school property or privately owned property while located on school property, weapons, alcohol or drugs, or for the willful infliction of injury to another person,” preceding “may be excluded,” deleted “for no more than one year in the case of an expulsion or withdrawal of admission and, in the case of a suspension of more than thirty days, for no longer than the duration of such suspension” following “withdrawal of admission,” and inserted the present second and third paragraphs; deleted former subsection C; designated former subsection D as present subsection C and rewrote the subsection; and added present subsection D.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 22.1-277.2:1.
Disciplinary authority of school boards under certain circumstances; alternative education program.

A school board may, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article, require any student who has been (i) charged with an offense relating to the Commonwealth’s laws, or with a violation of school board policies, on weapons, alcohol or drugs, or intentional injury to another person, or with an offense that is required to be disclosed to the superintendent of the school division pursuant to subsection G of § 16.1-260; (ii) found guilty or not innocent of an offense relating to the Commonwealth’s laws on weapons, alcohol, or drugs, or of a crime that resulted in or could have resulted in injury to others, or of an offense that is required to be disclosed to the superintendent of the school division pursuant to subsection G of § 16.1-260; (iii) found to have committed a serious offense or repeated offenses in violation of school board policies; (iv) suspended pursuant to § 22.1-277.05; or (v) expelled pursuant to § 22.1-277.06, 22.1-277.07, or 22.1-277.08, or subsection C of § 22.1-277, to attend an alternative education program. A school board may require such student to attend such programs regardless of where the crime occurred. School boards may require any student who has been found, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article, to have been in possession of, or under the influence of, drugs or alcohol on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity in violation of school board policies, to undergo evaluation for drug or alcohol abuse, or both, and, if recommended by the evaluator and with the consent of the student’s parent, to participate in a treatment program.As used in this section, the term “charged” means that a petition or warrant has been filed or is pending against a pupil.

A school board may adopt regulations authorizing the division superintendent or his designee to require students to attend an alternative education program consistent with the provisions of subsection A after (i) written notice to the student and his parent that the student will be required to attend an alternative education program and (ii) notice of the opportunity for the student or his parent to participate in a hearing to be conducted by the division superintendent or his designee regarding such placement. The decision of the superintendent or his designee regarding such alternative education placement shall be final unless altered by the school board, upon timely written petition, as established in regulation, by the student or his parent, for a review of the record by the school board.

A school board may adopt regulations authorizing the principal or his designee to impose a short-term suspension, pursuant to § 22.1-277.04, upon a student who has been charged with an offense involving intentional injury enumerated in subsection G of § 16.1-260, to another student in the same school pending a decision as to whether to require that such student attend an alternative education program.

History.

1990, c. 835; 1995, cc. 724, 755, 801; 1998, c. 355; 1999, c. 457; 2000, c. 577, § 22.1-277.1; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2003, c. 119; 2009, c. 208; 2018, c. 585.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 in clause A (ii), substituted “of an offense that” for “for which the disposition ordered by a court,” and “subsection G of § 16.1-260” for “§ 16.1-305.1.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 208, in the first sentence of subsection A, inserted “or with an offense that is required . . . subsection G of § 16.1-260” at the end in clause (i) and substituted “§ 22.1-277.06, 22.1-277.07, or 22.1-277.08” for §§ 22.1-277.06, 22.1-277.07, or § 22.1-277.08” in clause (v); and added subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 585 substituted “subsection C of § 22.1-277” for “subsection B of § 22.1-277” in clause (v) of subsection A.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

§ 22.1-277.2:2.
Alternative education program data.

The Department of Education shall annually collect from each school board and publish on its website data on alternative education programs for students who have been suspended, expelled, or otherwise precluded from attendance at school. Such data shall (i) be published in a manner that protects the identities of individual students; (ii) be disaggregated by local school division and by student race, ethnicity, gender, and disability; and (iii) include:

The number of students enrolled in alternative education programs pursuant to each of the five clauses set forth in subsection A of § 22.1-277.2:1;

The number of students enrolled in alternative education programs who have received (i) a short-term suspension, (ii) a long-term suspension, or (iii) an expulsion;

The current availability of various categories of alternative education programs available to all students and not solely special education students, including full-day programs with on-site, in-school teacher instruction; full-day programs with off-site, out-of-school teacher instruction; primarily virtual instruction; home-based or home-bound instruction; partial-day instruction; and any other category that the Department of Education may identify;

The average length of enrollment in an alternative education program per program during each school year;

The number of students who transition within the same school year from an alternative education program back into the school at which they were enrolled immediately preceding enrollment in the alternative education program; and

Relevant student achievement data, as determined by the Department of Education.

History.

2019, cc. 123, 232.

§§ 22.1-278 through 22.1-278.3.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 436, 440, and 841 amended § 22.1-278.1, which was repealed by Acts 2001, c. 688. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, these amendments have been effectuated in new § 22.1-279.8.

Former §§ 22.1-278 through 22.1-278.3, relating to guidelines for school board regulations governing student conduct; school safety audits and school crisis and emergency management plans; regulation of use of beepers or other portable communications devices and laser pointers; and policies regarding certain political or issue-oriented materials, were derived from Code 1950, §§ 22-230.1, 22-230.2; 1972, c. 604; 1980, c. 559; 1993, cc. 819, 856, 889; 1995, cc. 724, 801; 1997, cc. 391, 585, 593, 608, 830; 1998, c. 902; 1999, cc. 432, 475, 516; 2000, c. 1063.

§ 22.1-279.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 797 and Acts 1991, c. 295.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 797, which repealed this section, in cl. 3 provided that the provisions of the 1990 act would become effective July 1, 1992. However, Acts 1991, c. 295, cl. 1 amended Acts 1990, c. 797, cl. 3, to make the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1991.

§ 22.1-279.1.
Corporal punishment prohibited.

No teacher, principal or other person employed by a school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth shall subject a student to corporal punishment. This prohibition of corporal punishment shall not be deemed to prevent (i) the use of incidental, minor or reasonable physical contact or other actions designed to maintain order and control; (ii) the use of reasonable and necessary force to quell a disturbance or remove a student from the scene of a disturbance which threatens physical injury to persons or damage to property; (iii) the use of reasonable and necessary force to prevent a student from inflicting physical harm on himself; (iv) the use of reasonable and necessary force for self-defense or the defense of others; or (v) the use of reasonable and necessary force to obtain possession of weapons or other dangerous objects or controlled substances or paraphernalia which are upon the person of the student or within his control.

In determining whether a person was acting within the exceptions provided in this section, due deference shall be given to reasonable judgments at the time of the event which were made by a teacher, principal or other person employed by a school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth.

For the purposes of this section, “corporal punishment” means the infliction of, or causing the infliction of, physical pain on a student as a means of discipline.This definition shall not include physical pain, injury or discomfort caused by the use of incidental, minor or reasonable physical contact or other actions designed to maintain order and control as permitted in subdivision (i) of subsection A of this section or the use of reasonable and necessary force as permitted by subdivisions (ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of subsection A of this section, or by participation in practice or competition in an interscholastic sport, or participation in physical education or an extracurricular activity.

History.

1989, c. 287; 1995, c. 681.

Cross references.

As to complaints of abuse and neglect against school personnel, and use of contact and reasonable and necessary force in certain circumstances, see §

63.2-1511

.

Law Review.

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

§ 22.1-279.1:1.
The use of seclusion and restraint in public schools; Board of Education regulations.

The Board shall adopt regulations on the use of seclusion and restraint in public elementary and secondary schools in the Commonwealth that (i) are consistent with its Guidelines for the Development of Policies and Procedures for Managing Student Behavior in Emergency Situations and the Fifteen Principles contained in the U.S. Department of Education’s Restraint and Seclusion: Resource Document; (ii) include definitions, criteria for use, restrictions for use, training requirements, notification requirements, reporting requirements, and follow-up requirements; and (iii) address distinctions, including distinctions in emotional and physical development, between (a) the general student population and the special education student population and (b) elementary school students and secondary school students. The Board shall specifically (1) identify and prohibit the use of any method of restraint or seclusion that it determines poses a significant danger to the student and (2) establish safety standards for seclusion.

History.

2015, cc. 142, 147; 2019, c. 591.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 591 added the second sentence.

§ 22.1-279.2.
Repealed by Acts 1995, c. 533.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 533, cl. 2 repealed the version of the section then in effect as well as the version which was contingently amended by Acts 1993, c. 929, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564.

Former § 22.1-279.2, which established Programs for Persons At-Risk (PPAR), was derived from Acts 1990, c. 797; 1991, cc. 295, 563; 1993, c. 930; 1994, cc. 760, 761.

§ 22.1-279.3.
Parental responsibility and involvement requirements.

Each parent of a student enrolled in a public school has a duty to assist the school in enforcing the standards of student conduct and compulsory school attendance in order that education may be conducted in an atmosphere free of disruption and threat to persons or property, and supportive of individual rights.

A school board shall provide opportunities for parental and community involvement in every school in the school division.

Within one calendar month of the opening of school, each school board shall, simultaneously with any other materials customarily distributed at that time, send to the parents of each enrolled student (i) a notice of the requirements of this section; (ii) a copy of the school board’s standards of student conduct; and (iii) a copy of the compulsory school attendance law. These materials shall include a notice to the parents that by signing the statement of receipt, parents shall not be deemed to waive, but to expressly reserve, their rights protected by the constitutions or laws of the United States or the Commonwealth and that a parent shall have the right to express disagreement with a school’s or school division’s policies or decisions.Each parent of a student shall sign and return to the school in which the student is enrolled a statement acknowledging the receipt of the school board’s standards of student conduct, the notice of the requirements of this section, and the compulsory school attendance law. Each school shall maintain records of such signed statements.

The school principal may request the student’s parent or parents, if both parents have legal and physical custody of such student, to meet with the principal or his designee to review the school board’s standards of student conduct and the parent’s or parents’ responsibility to participate with the school in disciplining the student and maintaining order, to ensure the student’s compliance with compulsory school attendance law, and to discuss improvement of the child’s behavior, school attendance, and educational progress.

In accordance with the due process procedures set forth in this article and the guidelines required by § 22.1-279.6, the school principal may notify the parents of any student who violates a school board policy or the compulsory school attendance requirements when such violation could result in the student’s suspension or the filing of a court petition, whether or not the school administration has imposed such disciplinary action or filed a petition. The notice shall state (i) the date and particulars of the violation; (ii) the obligation of the parent to take actions to assist the school in improving the student’s behavior and ensuring compulsory school attendance compliance; (iii) that, if the student is suspended, the parent may be required to accompany the student to meet with school officials; and (iv) that a petition with the juvenile and domestic relations court may be filed under certain circumstances to declare the student a child in need of supervision.

No suspended student shall be admitted to the regular school program until such student and his parent have met with school officials to discuss improvement of the student’s behavior, unless the school principal or his designee determines that readmission, without parent conference, is appropriate for the student.

Upon the failure of a parent to comply with the provisions of this section, the school board may, by petition to the juvenile and domestic relations court, proceed against such parent for willful and unreasonable refusal to participate in efforts to improve the student’s behavior or school attendance, as follows:

If the court finds that the parent has willfully and unreasonably failed to meet, pursuant to a request of the principal as set forth in subsection D of this section, to review the school board’s standards of student conduct and the parent’s responsibility to assist the school in disciplining the student and maintaining order, and to discuss improvement of the child’s behavior and educational progress, it may order the parent to so meet; or

If the court finds that a parent has willfully and unreasonably failed to accompany a suspended student to meet with school officials pursuant to subsection F, or upon the student’s receiving a second suspension or being expelled, it may order the student or his parent, or both, to participate in such programs or such treatment, including, but not limited to, extended day programs, summer school, other educational programs and counseling, as the court deems appropriate to improve the student’s behavior or school attendance. The order may also require participation in a parenting, counseling or a mentoring program, as appropriate or that the student or his parent, or both, shall be subject to such conditions and limitations as the court deems appropriate for the supervision, care, and rehabilitation of the student or his parent. In addition, the court may order the parent to pay a civil penalty not to exceed $500.

The civil penalties established pursuant to this section shall be enforceable in the juvenile and domestic relations court in which the student’s school is located and shall be paid into a fund maintained by the appropriate local governing body to support programs or treatments designed to improve the behavior of students as described in subdivision G 2. Upon the failure to pay the civil penalties imposed by this section, the attorney for the appropriate county, city, or town shall enforce the collection of such civil penalties.

All references in this section to the juvenile and domestic relations court shall be also deemed to mean any successor in interest of such court.

History.

1995, c. 852; 1996, c. 771; 2000, c. 538; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2004, c. 573.

Cross references.

As to proceedings against certain parents for failure to comply, see § 16.1-241.2.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 538, in subsection D, inserted “or parents, if both parents have legal and physical custody of such student,” and inserted “or parents’ ” preceding “responsibility to”; in subdivision G 2, substituted “a” for “the” following “court finds that,” inserted “or both” following “his parent” in clause (i) and clause (ii), and inserted “including participation in parenting counseling or a mentoring program, as appropriate”; and substituted “G 2” for “3 of subsection G” in subsection H.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 688 and 820 are identical, and in subsection E, substituted “the due process procedures set forth in this article” for “§ 22.1-277,” and substituted “§ 22.1-279.6” for “§ 22.1-278.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 573 inserted “compulsory school” near the middle in subsection A; in subsection C, inserted clause (iii) in the first paragraph and “and the compulsory school attendance law” in the second paragraph; in subsection D, inserted “to ensure the student’s compliance with compulsory school attendance law” and “school attendance”; in subsection E, in the first sentence, inserted “or the compulsory school attendance requirements” and “or the filing of a court petition” and added “or filed a petition” at the end and in the last sentence, inserted “and ensuring compulsory school attendance compliance” in clause (ii) and added clause (iv); inserted “or school attendance” in the introductory paragraph of subsection G; in subdivision G 2, divided the former sentence into two sentences by substituting “or school attendance. The order may also require” for “including,” and in the first sentence, deleted the (i) designation preceding “the student or his parent” and inserted “including, but not limited to . . . and counseling” and in the last sentence, substituted “that” for “(ii)” and “shall” for “to”; and made related and minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Courts. § 1.05 District Courts; Chapter 32 Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts; Family Courts; Small Claims Courts; Commissioners in Chancery; Local Rules of Court. § 32.02 Proceedings in Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-142 Petition and Order for Parental Participation; No. 9-303. Petition and Order for Parental Participation.